Hawaii, session 2026, SB406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§92-21 Copies of records; other costs and fees.  (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, a copy of any government record, including any map, plan, diagram, photograph, photostat, or geographic information system digital data file[, which] that is open to the inspection of the public, shall be furnished to any person applying for the same by the public officer having charge or control thereof upon the payment of the reasonable cost of reproducing [such] the copy. (b) Except as provided in section 91-2.5[,] or subsection (c), the cost of reproducing any government record[, except geographic information system digital data,] pursuant to subsection (a) shall not be less than 5 cents per page, sheet, or fraction thereof. (c)  The cost of reproducing a digital copy of any government record pursuant to subsection (a) shall not exceed 5 cents per digital record; provided that the government record has already been digitized. (d) The cost of reproducing [geographic information system digital data] any government record pursuant to this section, including reproducing a digital copy of a government record that has not already been digitized, shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the agency having charge or control of that data[.  Such], subject to the limitations and requirements of this section. The reproduction cost shall include but shall not be limited to labor cost for search and actual time for reproducing, material cost, including electricity cost, equipment cost, including rental cost, cost for certification, and other related costs. (e) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be paid in by the public officer receiving or collecting the [same] fees to the state director of finance, [the] county director of finance, or [to the] agency or department by which the officer is employed, as government realizations; provided that fees collected by the public utilities commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the public utilities commission special fund established under section 269-33." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2525.